Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-245
Unsolicited advertisement to telephone facsimile machine; prohibited.

A person shall not use a telephone facsimile machine, computer, or other device to send an unsolicited advertisement to a telephone facsimile machine.

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1209;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 107.